lt-LT: Įtraukti liežuvėliai: Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis (nendrinis); Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis (nendrinis) + burdono liežuvėliai (nendriniai); Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis (nendrinis) + burdono liežuvėliai (sintetiniai); Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis (sintetinis); Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis (sintetinis) + burdono liežuvėliai (nendriniai); Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis (sintetinis) + burdono liežuvėliai (sintetiniai); Burdono liežuvėliai (nendriniai); Burdono liežuvėliai (sintetiniai); Liežuvėlių nepridėta; Nenurodyta; Kita
sv: Rörblad ingår: Rörblad till melodipipa (rörvass); Rörblad till melodipipa (rörvass) + rörblad till bordun (rörvass); Rörblad till melodipipa (rörvass) + rörblad till bordun (syntetiska); Rörblad till melodipipa (syntetiskt); Rörblad till melodipipa (syntetiskt) + rörblad till bordun (rörvass); Rörblad till melodipipa (syntetiskt) + rörblad till bordun (syntetiska); Rörblad till bordun (rörvass); Rörblad till bordun (syntetiska); Inga rörblad ingår; Ospecificerat; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vključeni piski: Melodijski jeziček (trs); Melodijski jeziček (trs) + bronski jezički (trs); Melodijski jeziček (trs) + bronski jezički (sintetika); Melodijski jeziček (sintetika); Melodijski jeziček (sintetika) + bronski jezički (trs); Melodijski jeziček (sintetika) + bronski jezički (sintetika); Bronski jezički (trs); Bronski jezički (sintetika); Brez jezičkov; Ni določeno; Drugo
tr: Dahil olan kamışlar: Melodi borusu kamışı (doğal); Melodi borusu kamışı (doğal) + dem ses kamışları (doğal); Melodi borusu kamışı (doğal) + dem ses kamışları (sentetik); Melodi borusu kamışı (sentetik); Melodi borusu kamışı (sentetik) + dem ses kamışları (doğal); Melodi borusu kamışı (sentetik) + dem ses kamışları (sentetik); Dem ses kamışları (doğal); Dem ses kamışları (sentetik); Kamış dahil değildir; Belirtilmemiş; Diğer
pl: Dołączone stroiki: Stroik przebierki (trzcina); Stroik przebierki (trzcina) + stroiki burdonowe (trzcina); Stroik przebierki (trzcina) + stroiki burdonowe (syntetyczne); Stroik przebierki (syntetyczny); Stroik przebierki (syntetyczny) + stroiki burdonowe (trzcina); Stroik przebierki (syntetyczny) + stroiki burdonowe (syntetyczne); Stroiki burdonowe (trzcina); Stroiki burdonowe (syntetyczne); Brak stroików w zestawie; Nie określono; Inne
pt-PT: Palhetas incluídas: Palheta do ponteiro (cana); Palheta do ponteiro (cana) + palhetas do bordão (cana); Palheta do ponteiro (cana) + palhetas do bordão (sintéticas); Palheta do ponteiro (sintética); Palheta do ponteiro (sintética) + palhetas do bordão (cana); Palheta do ponteiro (sintética) + palhetas do bordão (sintéticas); Palhetas do bordão (cana); Palhetas do bordão (sintéticas); Nenhuma palheta incluída; Não especificado; Outro
hr-HR: Uključene trske: Jezičac za prebiraljku (trska); Jezičac za prebiraljku (trska) + jezičci za trubnjeve (trska); Jezičac za prebiraljku (trska) + jezičci za trubnjeve (sintetika); Jezičac za prebiraljku (sintetika); Jezičac za prebiraljku (sintetika) + jezičci za trubnjeve (trska); Jezičac za prebiraljku (sintetika) + jezičci za trubnjeve (sintetika); Jezičci za trubnjeve (trska); Jezičci za trubnjeve (sintetika); Jezičci nisu uključeni; Nije navedeno; Ostalo
de: Enthaltene Rohrblätter: Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt (Schilf); Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt (Schilf) + Bordun-Rohrblätter (Schilf); Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt (Schilf) + Bordun-Rohrblätter (synthetisch); Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt (synthetisch); Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt (synthetisch) + Bordun-Rohrblätter (Schilf); Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt (synthetisch) + Bordun-Rohrblätter (synthetisch); Bordun-Rohrblätter (Schilf); Bordun-Rohrblätter (synthetisch); Keine Rohrblätter enthalten; Nicht angegeben; Sonstige
ja: リード付属: チャンターリード (ケーン); チャンターリード (ケーン) + ドローンリード (ケーン); チャンターリード (ケーン) + ドローンリード (合成); チャンターリード (合成); チャンターリード (合成) + ドローンリード (ケーン); チャンターリード (合成) + ドローンリード (合成); ドローンリード (ケーン); ドローンリード (合成); リード付属なし; 指定なし; その他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται καλάμια: Καλάμι chanter (καλάμι); Καλάμι chanter (καλάμι) + καλάμια drone (καλάμι); Καλάμι chanter (καλάμι) + καλάμια drone (συνθετικά); Καλάμι chanter (συνθετικό); Καλάμι chanter (συνθετικό) + καλάμια drone (καλάμι); Καλάμι chanter (συνθετικό) + καλάμια drone (συνθετικά); Καλάμια drone (καλάμι); Καλάμια drone (συνθετικά); Δεν περιλαμβάνονται καλάμια; Δεν καθορίζεται; Άλλο
pt-BR: Palhetas incluídas: Palheta de ponteira (cana); Palheta de ponteira (cana) + palhetas de bordão (cana); Palheta de ponteira (cana) + palhetas de bordão (sintéticas); Palheta de ponteira (sintética); Palheta de ponteira (sintética) + palhetas de bordão (cana); Palheta de ponteira (sintética) + palhetas de bordão (sintéticas); Palhetas de bordão (cana); Palhetas de bordão (sintéticas); Nenhuma palheta incluída; Não especificado; Outro
ro-RO: Ancii incluse: Ancie de chanter (trestie); Ancie de chanter (trestie) + ancii de ison (trestie); Ancie de chanter (trestie) + ancii de ison (sintetice); Ancie de chanter (sintetică); Ancie de chanter (sintetică) + ancii de ison (trestie); Ancie de chanter (sintetică) + ancii de ison (sintetice); Ancii de ison (trestie); Ancii de ison (sintetice); Fără ancii incluse; Nespecificat; Altele
it: Canne incluse: Ancia del chanter (canna); Ancia del chanter (canna) + ance del bordone (canna); Ancia del chanter (canna) + ance del bordone (sintetica); Ancia del chanter (sintetica); Ancia del chanter (sintetica) + ance del bordone (canna); Ancia del chanter (sintetica) + ance del bordone (sintetica); Ance del bordone (canna); Ance del bordone (sintetica); Nessuna ancia inclusa; Non specificato; Altro
ru: Входящие в комплект трости: Трость для чантера (тростник); Трость для чантера (тростник) + трости для дронов (тростник); Трость для чантера (тростник) + трости для дронов (синтетика); Трость для чантера (синтетика); Трость для чантера (синтетика) + трости для дронов (тростник); Трость для чантера (синтетика) + трости для дронов (синтетика); Трости для дронов (тростник); Трости для дронов (синтетика); Трости не входят в комплект; Не указано; Другое
hu: Sípnyelvek mellékelve: Dallamsíp nád (természetes nád); Dallamsíp nád (természetes nád) + bordunsíp nádak (természetes nád); Dallamsíp nád (természetes nád) + bordunsíp nádak (szintetikus); Dallamsíp nád (szintetikus); Dallamsíp nád (szintetikus) + bordunsíp nádak (természetes nád); Dallamsíp nád (szintetikus) + bordunsíp nádak (szintetikus); Bordunsíp nádak (természetes nád); Bordunsíp nádak (szintetikus); Nincs mellékelve nád; Nincs megadva; Egyéb
nl: Meegeleverde rieten: Melodieriet (riet); Melodieriet (riet) + bourdonrieten (riet); Melodieriet (riet) + bourdonrieten (synthetisch); Melodieriet (synthetisch); Melodieriet (synthetisch) + bourdonrieten (riet); Melodieriet (synthetisch) + bourdonrieten (synthetisch); Bourdonrieten (riet); Bourdonrieten (synthetisch); Geen rieten inbegrepen; Niet gespecificeerd; Overig
sk-SK: Jazýčky v cene: Chanterový plátok (trstinový); Chanterový plátok (trstinový) + burdónové plátky (trstinové); Chanterový plátok (trstinový) + burdónové plátky (syntetické); Chanterový plátok (syntetický); Chanterový plátok (syntetický) + burdónové plátky (trstinové); Chanterový plátok (syntetický) + burdónové plátky (syntetické); Burdónové plátky (trstinové); Burdónové plátky (syntetické); Bez plátkov; Nešpecifikované; Iné
en: Reeds included: Chanter reed (cane); Chanter reed (cane) + drone reeds (cane); Chanter reed (cane) + drone reeds (synthetic); Chanter reed (synthetic); Chanter reed (synthetic) + drone reeds (cane); Chanter reed (synthetic) + drone reeds (synthetic); Drone reeds (cane); Drone reeds (synthetic); No reeds included; Not specified; Other
zh-TW: 包含簧片: 旋律管簧片 (蘆葦); 旋律管簧片 (蘆葦) + 和聲管簧片 (蘆葦); 旋律管簧片 (蘆葦) + 和聲管簧片 (合成); 旋律管簧片 (合成); 旋律管簧片 (合成) + 和聲管簧片 (蘆葦); 旋律管簧片 (合成) + 和聲管簧片 (合成); 和聲管簧片 (蘆葦); 和聲管簧片 (合成); 不含簧片; 未指定; 其他
da: Medfølgende rørblade: Chanter-rørblad (naturrør); Chanter-rørblad (naturrør) + bordun-rørblade (naturrør); Chanter-rørblad (naturrør) + bordun-rørblade (syntetisk); Chanter-rørblad (syntetisk); Chanter-rørblad (syntetisk) + bordun-rørblade (naturrør); Chanter-rørblad (syntetisk) + bordun-rørblade (syntetisk); Bordun-rørblade (naturrør); Bordun-rørblade (syntetisk); Ingen rørblade inkluderet; Ikke angivet; Andet
fr: Anches incluses: Anche de chanter (roseau); Anche de chanter (roseau) + anches de bourdon (roseau); Anche de chanter (roseau) + anches de bourdon (synthétique); Anche de chanter (synthétique); Anche de chanter (synthétique) + anches de bourdon (roseau); Anche de chanter (synthétique) + anches de bourdon (synthétique); Anches de bourdon (roseau); Anches de bourdon (synthétique); Aucune anche incluse; Non spécifié; Autre
th: ลิ้นเป่าที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ลิ้นปี่ (ไม้คาน); ลิ้นปี่ (ไม้คาน) + ลิ้นโดรน (ไม้คาน); ลิ้นปี่ (ไม้คาน) + ลิ้นโดรน (สังเคราะห์); ลิ้นปี่ (สังเคราะห์); ลิ้นปี่ (สังเคราะห์) + ลิ้นโดรน (ไม้คาน); ลิ้นปี่ (สังเคราะห์) + ลิ้นโดรน (สังเคราะห์); ลิ้นโดรน (ไม้คาน); ลิ้นโดรน (สังเคราะห์); ไม่รวมลิ้น; ไม่ระบุ; อื่นๆ
nb: Rørblad inkludert: Spillerørblad (rørsiv); Spillerørblad (rørsiv) + bordunrørblad (rørsiv); Spillerørblad (rørsiv) + bordunrørblad (syntetisk); Spillerørblad (syntetisk); Spillerørblad (syntetisk) + bordunrørblad (rørsiv); Spillerørblad (syntetisk) + bordunrørblad (syntetisk); Bordunrørblad (rørsiv); Bordunrørblad (syntetisk); Ingen rørblad inkludert; Ikke spesifisert; Annet
fi: Ruokopillit sisältyvät: Melodiapillin ruoko (luonnonruoko); Melodiapillin ruoko (luonnonruoko) + bordunaruo'ot (luonnonruoko); Melodiapillin ruoko (luonnonruoko) + bordunaruo'ot (synteettinen); Melodiapillin ruoko (synteettinen); Melodiapillin ruoko (synteettinen) + bordunaruo'ot (luonnonruoko); Melodiapillin ruoko (synteettinen) + bordunaruo'ot (synteettinen); Bordunaruo'ot (luonnonruoko); Bordunaruo'ot (synteettinen); Ei sisällä ruokoja; Ei määritetty; Muu
vi: Lưỡi gà được bao gồm: Dăm kèn giai điệu (lau sậy); Dăm kèn giai điệu (lau sậy) + dăm kèn bè (lau sậy); Dăm kèn giai điệu (lau sậy) + dăm kèn bè (sợi tổng hợp); Dăm kèn giai điệu (sợi tổng hợp); Dăm kèn giai điệu (sợi tổng hợp) + dăm kèn bè (lau sậy); Dăm kèn giai điệu (sợi tổng hợp) + dăm kèn bè (sợi tổng hợp); Dăm kèn bè (lau sậy); Dăm kèn bè (sợi tổng hợp); Không bao gồm dăm kèn; Không xác định; Khác
ko: 리드 포함: 찬터 리드(케인); 찬터 리드(케인) + 드론 리드(케인); 찬터 리드(케인) + 드론 리드(합성 소재); 찬터 리드(합성 소재); 찬터 리드(합성 소재) + 드론 리드(케인); 찬터 리드(합성 소재) + 드론 리드(합성 소재); 드론 리드(케인); 드론 리드(합성 소재); 리드 미포함; 지정되지 않음; 기타
es: Lengüetas incluidas: Lengüeta de puntero (caña); Lengüeta de puntero (caña) + lengüetas de roncón (caña); Lengüeta de puntero (caña) + lengüetas de roncón (sintéticas); Lengüeta de puntero (sintética); Lengüeta de puntero (sintética) + lengüetas de roncón (caña); Lengüeta de puntero (sintética) + lengüetas de roncón (sintéticas); Lengüetas de roncón (caña); Lengüetas de roncón (sintéticas); No incluye lengüetas; No especificado; Otro
cs: Plátky jsou součástí balení: Plátek melodické píšťaly (třtinový); Plátek melodické píšťaly (třtinový) + plátky bordunové píšťaly (třtinové); Plátek melodické píšťaly (třtinový) + plátky bordunové píšťaly (syntetické); Plátek melodické píšťaly (syntetický); Plátek melodické píšťaly (syntetický) + plátky bordunové píšťaly (třtinové); Plátek melodické píšťaly (syntetický) + plátky bordunové píšťaly (syntetické); Plátky bordunové píšťaly (třtinové); Plátky bordunové píšťaly (syntetické); Neobsahuje plátky; Nespecifikováno; Ostatní
bg-BG: Включени пискуни: Писък за гайдуница (тръстика); Писък за гайдуница (тръстика) + писъци за ручило (тръстика); Писък за гайдуница (тръстика) + писъци за ручило (синтетика); Писък за гайдуница (синтетика); Писък за гайдуница (синтетика) + писъци за ручило (тръстика); Писък за гайдуница (синтетика) + писъци за ручило (синтетика); Писъци за ручило (тръстика); Писъци за ручило (синтетика); Не са включени; Не е посочено; Други
zh-CN: 随附簧片: 主奏管簧片（芦竹）; 主奏管簧片（芦竹）+ 和音管簧片（芦竹）; 主奏管簧片（芦竹）+ 和音管簧片（合成）; 主奏管簧片（合成）; 主奏管簧片（合成）+ 和音管簧片（芦竹）; 主奏管簧片（合成）+ 和音管簧片（合成）; 和音管簧片（芦竹）; 和音管簧片（合成）; 不含簧片; 未指定; 其他